dev/saldo/saldo.verbs.dix
    <pardef n="sy__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tts</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tt</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tt</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tts</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>dd</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>dds</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>dda</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ddas</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>dde</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ddes</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>dda</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ddas</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>dda</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ddas</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ddes</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>dde</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ende</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>endes</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>r</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ös/a__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ts</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ts</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ts</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ta</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tas</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>te</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tes</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ta</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tas</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ta</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tas</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tes</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>te</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ande</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>andes</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>es</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/ivas__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>ivas</l><r>ivas<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ivits</l><r>ivas<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ivs</l><r>ivas<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>evs</l><r>ivas<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ivs</l><r>ivas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nöj/as__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ts</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>des</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="åtnöjas"><i>åtnöj</i><par n="nöj/as__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nedblåsa"><i>nedblås</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tentamensläsa"><i>tentamensläs</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förtjusa"><i>förtjus</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jäsa"><i>jäs</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="utlysa"><i>utlys</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skräddarsy"><i>skräddarsy</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="genomlysa"><i>genomlys</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ösa"><i>ös</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="utelåsa"><i>utelås</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blåsa"><i>blås</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="efterlysa"><i>efterlys</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bannlysa"><i>bannlys</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="underblåsa"><i>underblås</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="korrekturläsa"><i>korrekturläs</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rentvå"><i>rentvå</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kyssa"><i>kyss</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beglänsa"><i>begläns</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ske"><i>ske</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="frälsa"><i>fräls</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fridlysa"><i>fridlys</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="återlösa"><i>återlös</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tilltro"><i>tilltro</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avhysa"><i>avhys</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="trå"><i>trå</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="försmå"><i>försmå</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kontrolläsa"><i>kontrolläs</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="resa"><i>res</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förlisa"><i>förlis</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bero"><i>bero</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avlösa"><i>avlös</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inlösa"><i>inlös</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gry"><i>gry</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avresa"><i>avres</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="utlösa"><i>utlös</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="överglänsa"><i>övergläns</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förlösa"><i>förlös</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="snäsa"><i>snäs</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="upplysa"><i>upplys</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="smörfräsa"><i>smörfräs</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="djupfrysa"><i>djupfrys</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="utläsa"><i>utläs</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uppresa"><i>uppres</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="upplösa"><i>upplös</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kväsa"><i>kväs</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förespå"><i>förespå</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sno"><i>sno</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hysa"><i>hys</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="näpsa"><i>näps</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bredså"><i>bredså</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gro"><i>gro</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rivas"><i>r</i><par n="r/ivas__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förutspå"><i>förutspå</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lösa"><i>lös</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="belysa"><i>belys</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avlysa"><i>avlys</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avläsa"><i>avläs</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ro"><i>ro</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="undfly"><i>undfly</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lysa"><i>lys</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uppläsa"><i>uppläs</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kringströ"><i>kringströ</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förete"><i>förete</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fräsa"><i>fräs</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sy"><i>sy</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sambo"><i>sambo</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="motläsa"><i>motläs</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="väsa"><i>väs</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fösa"><i>fös</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="låsa"><i>lås</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vidkännas"><i>vidkänn</i><par n="nöj/as__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="järnsko"><i>järnsko</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="läsa"><i>läs</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="anförtro"><i>anförtro</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inhysa"><i>inhys</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lusläsa"><i>lusläs</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spy"><i>spy</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avblåsa"><i>avblås</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bo"><i>bo</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sträckläsa"><i>sträckläs</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tykännas"><i>tykänn</i><par n="nöj/as__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nöjas"><i>nöj</i><par n="nöj/as__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nerblåsa"><i>nerblås</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="klösa"><i>klös</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="oppläsa"><i>oppläs</i><par n="ös/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nå"><i>nå</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gno"><i>gno</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ombetro"><i>ombetro</i><par n="sy__vblex"/></e>
